Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
155

AGRICULTURAL
AND WATER INFRASTRUCTURE LOANS

Part I. Agricultural Loan Program

Section

155-1 Definitions

155-2 Objectives

155-3 Restriction

155-4 Powers and duties of the department

155-5 Loans insured by the department

155-5.5 Loans guaranteed by the department

155-5.6 Loan guaranty; important agricultural
lands;

agricultural and aquacultural loans

155-6 Participation in loans by the department

155-6.5 Cooperation in loans by the department

155-7 Repealed

155-8 Direct loans

155-9 Classes of loans; purposes, terms,
eligibility

155-10 General eligibility requirements for loans

155-11 Security for loans; mortgages

155-12 Conditions

155-13 Repayment; refinancing

155-14 Funds; application of payments

155-15 Repealed

Part II. Water Infrastructure Loans

155-31 Definitions

155-32 Hawaii water infrastructure loan program

155-33 Powers of the department

155-34 Hawaii water infrastructure special fund

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 2016, c 171, §2.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next